Hawaii statutes.
§431P-9 Powers of the commissioner.
(a) For the purpose of ascertaining the fund's condition or compliance with
this chapter, the commissioner shall examine the accounts, records, documents,
and transactions of the fund at least once every three years commencing at the
time the fund starts issuing policies of hurricane property insurance or more
often if the commissioner deems advisable. The fund shall pay all reasonable
and actually incurred expenses of the examination in accordance with section
431:2-306(b); provided that a detailed estimate of the expenses to be incurred
shall be approved by the board prior to the examination. In the event the
actual expenses incurred are in excess of ten per cent of the estimate, the
commissioner shall communicate in writing to the board the reason for the
excess expenses.

(b) The commissioner may exercise all of the
commissioner's powers provided by law in the supervision and regulation of the
fund, any servicing facility, and any other person or entity subject to the
jurisdiction of the commissioner. [L 1993, c 339, pt of §2; am L Sp 1995, c 17,
§4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next